Mississippi, session 2026, SB3051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to defray the expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................ $ 37,697,472.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Finance and Administration for the purpose of defraying the expenses incurred in the operation of the various offices of the department for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.......................... ............................................ $ 49,111,907.00. SECTION 3. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:               $ 20,015,556.00 Special Funds:               $  5,963,561.00 Total Funds:                 $ 25,979,117.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages and Fringe Benefits:            $ 25,595,930.00 Progressions:                $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:             $    383,187.00 Total Personal Services:      $ 25,979,117.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   295 Time-Limited: 1 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits. Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2027 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2027 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2027 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2027 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2027. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2026. If the agency fills additional headcounts after February 1, 2026, until the end of Fiscal Year 2026, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally adjusted to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions or increase the Personal Services total without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2026 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2027, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 4.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the Tort Claims Trust Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Tort Claims Board in the administration of the Tort Claims Act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............ ............................................. $ 6,155,363.00. SECTION 5. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 4 of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                  $       0.00 Special Funds:                  $ 211,453.00 Total Funds:                    $ 211,453.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages and Fringe Benefits:              $ 211,453.00 Progressions:                   $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:                $       0.00 Total Personal Services:         $ 211,453.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   2 Time-Limited:                0 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits. Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2027 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2027 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2027 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2027 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2027. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2026. If the agency fills additional headcounts after February 1, 2026, until the end of Fiscal Year 2026, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally adjusted to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions or increase the Personal Services total without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2026 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2027, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 6.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Commission on the Status of Women for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 44,125.00. SECTION 7.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Commission on the Status of Women for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the commission for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027......... $ 3,135.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of providing funds to defray the expense of the Mississippi Commission on the Status of Women as established pursuant to Sections 43-59-1 through 43-59-14, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 8. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 6 and 7 of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                   $ 44,125.00 Special Funds:                   $      0.00 Total Funds:                     $ 44,125.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages and Fringe Benefits:               $      0.00 Progressions:                    $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:                 $ 44,125.00 Total Personal Services:          $ 44,125.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   1 Time-Limited:                0 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits. Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2027 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2027 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2027 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2027 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2027. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2026. If the agency fills additional headcounts after February 1, 2026, until the end of Fiscal Year 2026, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally adjusted to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions or increase the Personal Services total without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2026 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2027, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 9.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of State Property Insurance for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027......... $ 21,351,906.00. SECTION 10.  Of the funds herein appropriated, it is the intention of the Legislature that two (2) of the allotted Full-Time Permanent Headcount in Section 3 of this act may be used for performing related administrative duties of the State Property Insurance Program. SECTION 11.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration for the purpose of providing a grant to the Mississippi Home Corporation, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 1,810,227.00. SECTION 12.  The funds appropriated in Section 11 of this act shall be targeted to individuals with disabilities or individuals with serious mental illnesses who: (1)  Are being discharged from a state psychiatric hospital after a stay of more than ninety (90) days; or, nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities after a stay of more than ninety (90) days; or (2)  Have been discharged from a state psychiatric hospital within the last two (2) years; and (a)  Had multiple hospital visits in the last year due to mental illness; or (b)  Are known to the mental health or state-housing agency to have been arrested or incarcerated in the last year due to conduct related to mental illness; or (c)  Are known to the mental health or state-housing agency to have been homeless for one (1) full year or have had four (4) or more episodes of homelessness in the last three (3) years; or (3)  Lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and includes a subset for an individual who is exiting an institution where he or she resided for ninety (90) days or less and who resides in an emergency shelter or a place not meant for human habitation immediately before entering that institution. Any funds appropriated herein to hire additional staff or employ staff shall only be used to implement this housing program. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Home Corporation shall provide an annual financial report based upon the state's fiscal year to the Attorney General, the Chairman of Senate Appropriations, the Chairman of House Appropriations, and the Legislative Budget Office. SECTION 14.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act for the Mississippi Home Corporation (MHC) shall be expended for the purpose of making a payment of any kind or for any purpose, directly or indirectly, to a member of the State of Mississippi Legislature, state official, MHC board member, or person who has been a member of the MHC within the last year. SECTION 15.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Broadband Expansion and Accessibility of Mississippi (BEAM) as established in Sections 77-19-1 through 77-19-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................. $      433,500.00. SECTION 16.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Broadband Expansion and Accessibility of Mississippi (BEAM) as established in Sections 77-19-1 through 77-19-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the commission for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..... ............................................. $ 175,914,472.00. SECTION 17. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 15 and 16 of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                  $ 300,000.00 Special Funds:                  $ 470,768.00 Total Funds:                    $ 770,768.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages and Fringe Benefits:              $ 770,768.00 Progressions:                   $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:                $       0.00 Total Personal Services:         $ 770,768.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   6 Time-Limited:                0 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits. Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2027 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2027 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2027 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2027 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2027. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2026. If the agency fills additional headcounts after February 1, 2026, until the end of Fiscal Year 2026, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally adjusted to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions or increase the Personal Services total without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2026 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2027, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 18.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Finance and Administration shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2026.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 19.  The department is authorized to expend available funds on technology or equipment upgrades or replacements when it will generate savings through efficiency or when the savings generated from such upgrades or replacements exceed expenditures thereof. SECTION 20.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 21.  The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Office of General Services is hereby expressly authorized and empowered to receive, budget and expend any state, local or other source funds designated for supplemental funding of construction and/or repairs and renovation projects.  The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Office of General Services shall not use any of the funds authorized in this section to pay salaries.  For the purposes of this section, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Office of General Services does not have the authority to escalate from the Capital Expense Fund or the Working Cash-Stabilization Reserve Fund. SECTION 22.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that an amount not to exceed Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00) is authorized to be expended for the purpose of transferring funds to the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management for the administration of projects for the repair and maintenance of state-owned buildings. SECTION 23.  A report based on expenditures incurred during the current and immediate past fiscal years shall be provided to the Legislative Budget Office each regularly scheduled legislative session. This report should reflect expenditures as a result of the operation of the Robert E. Lee Building, the Woolfolk State Office Building, the Gartin and Sillers Buildings, the Capitol Buildings, the Central High School Building, the Robert G. Clark, Jr. Building and other state buildings, and this report should contain any steps taken to reduce operating costs. SECTION 24.  It is the intention of the Legislature that no state-owned aircraft shall be utilized by any person except for official business only. SECTION 25.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, an amount not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) is authorized to be expended to defray any shortfall in the Master Lease Purchase Program as defined in Section 31-7-10, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 26.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) shall be expended from the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund, as established in Section 29-5-215, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 27.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to escalate its budget and expend such funds in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds in an amount not to exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund for the purpose of defraying administrative and reporting costs. SECTION 28.  Notwithstanding any other provision, the agency shall have the authority to escalate its headcount for any additional operational needs related to Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds, upon approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Personnel Board. SECTION 29.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital City Water/Sewer Projects Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2044, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the purpose of providing funds to assist the City of Jackson, Mississippi, in paying costs associated with construction, reconstruction, repairs, upgrades and improvements to the City of Jackson's water and sewer systems and related facilities as authorized in Section 29-5-251, established in Section 37-185-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................. $ 25,302,643.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, in no event shall the amount expended exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, or change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 30.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2044, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the purpose of defraying eligible administration and reporting expenses related to the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... ............................................ $ 12,187,789.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, in no event shall the amount expended exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, or change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 31.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Department of Finance and Administration for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Fund, as reappropriated in Senate Bill No. 2044, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the Mississippi Semi-quincentennial Commission for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027....................................... $ 1,158,446.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 32. With the funds appropriated herein, the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to make payments for expenses incurred prior to fiscal year 2025 for an amount not to exceed Sixty-one Thousand Six Hundred Fifty-one Dollars and Twenty-five cents ($61,651.25).  These payments are for Bureau of Building invoices. SECTION 33.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 34.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 35.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.